src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/verbTVaeaa_gt-norm.yaml
  Verb - njammat: # JUHKAT_TV
    njammat+V+TV+Inf: njammat
    njammat+V+TV+Sup: njamátjit
    njammat+V+TV+Ger: njamádijn
    njammat+V+TV+PrfPrc: njammam
    njammat+V+TV+PrsPrc: njamme
    njammat+V+TV+Actio+Ess: njammamin
    njammat+V+TV+Actio+Ela: njammamis
    njammat+V+TV+VAbess: njamák
    njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njamáv
    njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: njamá
    njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: njammabihtit
    njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: njammi
    njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: njammiv
    njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: njammi
    njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: njamáj
    njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: njamájma
    njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: njamájda
    njammat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: njamájga
    njammat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: njamá
    njammat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: njammis
    njammat+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: njammon
    njammat+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: njamme
    njammat+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: njammiska
    njammat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: njammup
    njammat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: njammut
    njammat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: njammusa
    njammat+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: njamátjav
    njammat+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: njamátja
    njammat+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: njamásj
    njammat+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: njamátji
    njammat+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njamáduváv
    njammat+V+TV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njammuv
    njammat+V+TV+Der/PassD+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njamádaláv
    njammat+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: njamálulu
    njammat+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: njamálulujma

  Verb - oajttet: # LÁHPPET_TV
    oajttet+V+TV+Inf: oajttet
    oajttet+V+TV+Sup: oajtátjit
    oajttet+V+TV+Ger: oajtedijn
    oajttet+V+TV+PrfPrc: oajttám
    oajttet+V+TV+PrsPrc: oajtte
    oajttet+V+TV+Actio+Ess: oajttemin
    oajttet+V+TV+Actio+Ela: oajttemis
    oajttet+V+TV+VAbess: oajtek
    oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oajtáv
    oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: oajtá
    oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: oajttebihtit
    oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: oajtti
    oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: oajttiv
    oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: oajtti
    oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: åjtij
    oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: åjtijma
    oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: åjtijda
    oajttet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: åjtijga
    oajttet+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: oajte
    oajttet+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: oajttis
    oajttet+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: oajtton
    oajttet+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: oajtte
    oajttet+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: oajttiska
    oajttet+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: oajttup
    oajttet+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: oajttut
    oajttet+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: oajttusa
    oajttet+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: åjtitjav
    oajttet+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: åjtitja
    oajttet+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: åjtisj
    oajttet+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: åjtitji
    oajttet+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oajteduváv
    oajttet+V+TV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oajttuv
    oajttet+V+TV+Der/PassD+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oajtádaláv
    oajttet+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: oajtálulu
    oajttet+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: oajtálulujma

  Verb - gierret: # JIEHKET_TV
    gierret+V+TV+Inf: gierret
    gierret+V+TV+Sup: [gærátjit, gärátjit]
    gierret+V+TV+Ger: gieredijn
    gierret+V+TV+PrfPrc: [gærrám, gärrám]
    gierret+V+TV+PrsPrc: gierre
    gierret+V+TV+Actio+Ess: gierremin
    gierret+V+TV+Actio+Ela: gierremis
    gierret+V+TV+VAbess: gierek
    gierret+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [gæráv, gäráv]
    gierret+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [gærá, gärá]
    gierret+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: gierrebihtit
    gierret+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: gierri
    gierret+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: gierriv
    gierret+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: gierri
    gierret+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: gierij
    gierret+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: gierijma
    gierret+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: gierijda
    gierret+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: gierijga
    gierret+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: giere
    gierret+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: gierris
    gierret+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: [gærron, gärron]
    gierret+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: gierre
    gierret+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: gierriska
    gierret+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: gerrup
    gierret+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: gerrut
    gierret+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: gerrusa
    gierret+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: gieritjav
    gierret+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: gieritja
    gierret+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: gierisj
    gierret+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: gieritji
    gierret+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: giereduváv
    gierret+V+TV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [gærruv, gärruv]
    gierret+V+TV+Der/PassD+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [gærádaláv, gärádaláv]
    gierret+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: [gærálulu, gärálulu]
    gierret+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: [gærálulujma, gärálulujma]

  Verb - diehtet: # DIEHTET_TV
    diehtet+V+TV+Inf: diehtet
    diehtet+V+TV+Sup: diedátjit
    diehtet+V+TV+Ger: diededijn
    diehtet+V+TV+PrfPrc: diehtám
    diehtet+V+TV+PrsPrc: []
    diehtet+V+TV+Actio+Ess: diehtemin
    diehtet+V+TV+Actio+Ela: diehtemis
    diehtet+V+TV+VAbess: diedek
    diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: diedáv
    diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: diedá
    diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: diehtebihtit
    diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: diehti
    diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: diehtiv
    diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: diehti
    diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: diedij
    diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: diedijma
    diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: diedijda
    diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: diedijga
    diehtet+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: diede
    diehtet+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: diehtis
    diehtet+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: diehton
    diehtet+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: diehtte
    diehtet+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: diehtiska
    diehtet+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: diehtup
    diehtet+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: diehtut
    diehtet+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: diehtusa
    diehtet+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: dieditjav
    diehtet+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: dieditja
    diehtet+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: diedisj
    diehtet+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: dieditji
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/Pass+V+Inf: []
    diehtet+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: diedálulu
    diehtet+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: diedálulujma

  Verb - jáhkket: # MÁHTTET_TV
    jáhkket+V+TV+Inf: jáhkket
    jáhkket+V+TV+Sup: jáhkátjit
    jáhkket+V+TV+Ger: jáhkedijn
    jáhkket+V+TV+PrfPrc: jáhkkám
    jáhkket+V+TV+Actio+Ess: jáhkkemin
    jáhkket+V+TV+Actio+Ela: jáhkkemis
    jáhkket+V+TV+VAbess: jáhkek
    jáhkket+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jáhkáv
    jáhkket+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: jáhká
    jáhkket+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: jáhkkebihtit
    jáhkket+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: jáhkki
    jáhkket+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: jáhkkiv
    jáhkket+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: jáhkki
    jáhkket+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: jáhkij
    jáhkket+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: jáhkijma
    jáhkket+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: jáhkijda
    jáhkket+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: jáhkijga
    jáhkket+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: jáhke
    jáhkket+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: jáhkkis
    jáhkket+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: jáhkkon
    jáhkket+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: jáhkke
    jáhkket+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: jáhkkiska
    jáhkket+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: jáhkkup
    jáhkket+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: jáhkkut
    jáhkket+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: jáhkkusa
    jáhkket+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: jáhkitjav
    jáhkket+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: jáhkitja
    jáhkket+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: jáhkisj
    jáhkket+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: jáhkitji
    jáhkket+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jáhkeduvvá
    jáhkket+V+TV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jáhkku
    jáhkket+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: jáhkálulu
    jáhkket+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: jáhkálulujma
